Utah statutes.
20A-16-504.   Equitable relief.

A court may issue an injunction or grant other equitable relief appropriate to ensure substantial compliance with, or enforce, this chapter on application by:

(1)  a covered voter alleging a grievance under this chapter; or

(2)  an election officer.

